Hawaii statutes.
§421C-3 Stock and nonstock associations;
general corporation laws, when applicable. (a) An association may either
be organized with stock or without stock. Subject to section 421C-20, if
organized with stock, the association shall require a certain amount of common
stock to be purchased from the association in order to permit a stockholder
voting and membership privileges, and no class of stock except common stock may
grant voting and membership privileges in a stock association. Subject to
section 421C-20, if organized without stock, the association shall require a
membership fee or amount of membership capital to be paid in, in order to
permit the member voting and membership privileges by means of issuance of a
membership certificate.

(b) Except where otherwise provided, statutes
and fees which apply to domestic profit corporations shall apply to stock
associations, and statutes and fees which apply to domestic nonprofit
corporations shall apply to nonstock associations.

(c) Associations may amend their articles upon
approval by the director of commerce and consumer affairs of articles of
amendment to convert from a stock association to a nonstock association or vice
versa. This subsection may be employed by an association only once every two calendar
years. [L 1982, c 97, pt of §2 and c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L 1984,
c 217, §3; am L 1988, c 373, §22]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next